Wisconsin, session 2025, SB452.
do enact as follows:SB452,11Section 1. 118.60 (2) (ac) of the statutes is created to read:SB452,2,82118.60 (2) (ac) Subject to pars. (ag) and (ar) and notwithstanding par. (bm), 3any pupil in grades kindergarten to 12 who resides in a school district other than a 41st class city school district may attend any private school participating in the 5program under this section if par. (a) 3. to 9. applies and the pupil’s sibling or a 6dependent child, as defined in s. 49.19 (1) (a), of the pupil’s parent or legal guardian 7attended a private school participating in the program under this section or s. 8119.23 in the previous school year.SB452,29Section 2. 119.23 (2) (ac) of the statutes is created to read:SB452,2,1510119.23 (2) (ac) Subject to pars. (ag) and (ar), any pupil in grades kindergarten 11to 12 who resides within the city may attend any private school participating in the 12program under this section if par. (a) 3. to 9. applies and the pupil’s sibling or a 13dependent child, as defined in s. 49.19 (1) (a), of the pupil’s parent or legal guardian 14attended a private school participating in the program under this section or s. 15118.60 in the previous school year.SB452,316Section 3. Initial applicability.SB452,2,1817(1) This act first applies to applications to attend a private school 18participating in a program under s. 118.60 or 119.23 in the 2026-27 school year.SB452,2,1919